Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONTINUATION OF STATE INNOVATION WAIVER.new text end new text begin The commissioner of commerce must apply to the secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services under United States Code, title 42, section 18052, for continuation of the state innovation waiver previously granted to implement the Minnesota premium security plan under Minnesota Statutes, section 62E.23, for benefit years beginning January 1, 2028, to maximize federal funding. The commissioner must submit the application by December 31, 2026. The waiver application must clearly state that operation of the Minnesota premium security plan after the 2027 benefit year is contingent on approval of the waiver request. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TRANSFER.new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must transfer $504,801,000 in fiscal year 2026 from the general fund to the premium security plan account under Minnesota Statutes, section 62E.25, subdivision 1. This is a onetime transfer. new text end